Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 589, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 589. A. It is unlawful for any person registered


pursuant to the Oklahoma Sex Offenders Registration Act or the Mary


Rippy Violent Crime Offenders Registration Act to work with or


provide services to children or to work on school premises, or for


any person or business which that contracts for work to be performed


on school premises to knowingly and willfully allow any employee to


work with children or to work on school premises who is registered


pursuant to the Oklahoma Sex Offenders Registration Act or the Mary


Rippy Violent Crime Offenders Registration Act. Upon conviction for

Req. No. 2208 Page 1


any violation of the provisions of this subsection, the violator


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). In addition, the violator may be


liable for civil damages.


B. 1. A person or business who offers or provides services to


children shall ensure compliance with subsection A of this section


by conducting a name search of employees at least annually against


the registries maintained pursuant to the Oklahoma Sex Offenders


Registration Act and the Mary Rippy Violent Crime Offenders


Registration Act while such person is working with or serving


children. All persons Any person working with or providing services


to children shall be required to sign a statement declaring that he


or she is not currently required to register under the provisions of


the Oklahoma Sex Offenders Registration Act or the Mary Rippy


Violent Crime Offenders Registration Act. Compliance with the


signed statement shall be mandatory for all persons any person


working with or providing services to children, and there shall be


no liability or obligation placed upon any person or business to


ascertain the truthfulness of the affidavit. Any person or business


having a contract with a school shall ensure compliance as provided


by Section 6-101.48 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. Failure of any person or business who works with or provides


services to children to conduct the annual name search of each


person employed shall be a misdemeanor. Upon conviction for failure

Req. No. 2208 Page 2


to conduct a name search, the violator shall be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00). Refusal of any person who is employed to work with or


provide services to children to sign a statement declaring they have


he or she has no requirement to register as provided in this section


shall be a misdemeanor, upon conviction, punishable by a fine not to


exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), and the person shall be


immediately terminated from employment. Any person discovering an


employment or registration violation as required by any provision of


law for any person currently employed to work with or provide


services to children has a duty to and shall immediately report such


findings to the district attorney.


C. It is unlawful for any law enforcement agency to employ any


person as a peace officer or criminal investigator who has received


a verdict of guilty or pled guilty or nolo contendere to any offense


required to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act


or the Mary Rippy Violent Crime Offenders Registration Act,


including those receiving a verdict of guilt, pleading guilty or


nolo contendere as part of a deferred judgment or other provision of


law authorizing a delayed or suspended judgment or sentence. Every


person receiving a verdict of guilty or pleading guilty or nolo


contendere to any offense required to register pursuant to the Sex


Offenders Registration Act or the Mary Rippy Violent Crime Offenders


Registration Act shall be prohibited from being certified by the

Req. No. 2208 Page 3


Council on Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET) as a peace


officer, private investigator, or security guard, and if at the time


of the verdict or plea such person has been previously CLEET


certified such certification shall be revoked. Any violator shall


be guilty of a misdemeanor upon conviction of noncompliance with the


provisions of this subsection.


D. A person or business that employs a person registered


pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act and that offers or


provides services where children are reasonably expected to be


present shall clearly post signage that is easily readable by the


average person stating that the person or business employs a person


registered pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act. A person


or business who offers or provides services where children are


reasonably expected to be present shall ensure compliance with this


subsection by conducting a name search of employees at least


annually against the registry maintained pursuant to the Sex


Offenders Registration Act while such person is employed. Any


person or business who violates the provisions of this subsection


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a


fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).


E. A person, regardless of whether he or she has a licensed


business, who is registered pursuant to the Sex Offenders


Registration Act and offers or provides services where children are


reasonably expected to be present shall clearly post signage that is

Req. No. 2208 Page 4


easily readable by the average person stating that the person is


registered pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act. Any


person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall, upon


conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to


exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2208 CN 1/11/2026 9:33:57 AM

































Req. No. 2208 Page 5